Georgia statutes. TITLE 53 Wills, Trusts, and Administration of Estates
Article 2 Actions Against Personal Representatives

53-7-10.
Allowable defenses; generally.

For purposes of this article, the term “personal representative” includes temporary administrators.

When an action is brought against a personal representative in that person’s representative capacity, the personal representative may make the following defenses:

That person does not occupy the position of personal representative, as alleged;

That no assets have come into the hands of the personal representative;

That all assets coming into the hands of the personal representative have been fully administered;

That all assets coming into the hands of the personal representative have been fully administered except those necessary to satisfy debts of a greater priority;

That the personal representative has fully administered the assets that came into the personal representative’s hands; or

That, pending the action, the letters testamentary or of administration have been revoked and the administration committed to another to whom all the assets that came into the personal representative’s hands have been delivered.

History.

Code 1981, §

53-7-10

, enacted by Ga. L. 1996, p. 504, § 10.

53-7-11.
Allowable defenses; action originating in lifetime of decedent.

When the cause of action originated in the lifetime of the decedent, a personal representative may make any defense or pleading that the decedent could have made if alive.

History.

Code 1981, §

53-7-11

, enacted by Ga. L. 1996, p. 504, § 10; Ga. L. 2020, p. 377, § 1-40/HB 865.

The 2020 amendment,

effective January 1, 2021, substituted “pleading that” for “pleading which” in this Code section.

53-7-12.
Survival of action.

An action against joint personal representatives shall not abate by the death of one but shall proceed against the survivor or survivors.

History.

Code 1981, §

53-7-12

, enacted by Ga. L. 1996, p. 504, § 10.

Cross references.

Substitution of parties by reason of death, §

9-11-25

.

53-7-13.
Service of notice, writ, or process.

In any action or proceeding brought pursuant to this article, service of any notice, writ, or process shall be made in the manner provided by Chapter 11 of this title if Chapter 11 of this title is applicable under Code Section 53-11-1. If Chapter 11 of this title is not applicable to such action or proceeding under Code Section 53-11-1, such service shall be made in the manner provided by Chapter 11 of Title 9 unless Chapter 11 of said title is not applicable to such action or proceeding under Code Section 9-11-81.

In all cases where there are two or more personal representatives and one or more of them remove beyond the limits of this state, service of any notice, writ, or process upon those remaining in the state shall be as effectual and complete, for all purposes whatever, as though such service had been made upon all of the personal representatives.

History.

Code 1981, §

53-7-13

, enacted by Ga. L. 1996, p. 504, § 10; Ga. L. 2020, p. 377, § 1-41/HB 865; Ga. L. 2021, p. 922, § 53/HB 497.

The 2020 amendment,

effective January 1, 2021, added subsection (a); designated the existing provisions as subsection (b); and, in subsection (b), substituted “notice, writ, or process” for “writ or process” and inserted “such”.

The 2021 amendment,

effective May 10, 2021, part of an Act to revise, modernize, and correct the Code, substituted “remove” for “removes” in the middle of subsection (b).

53-7-14.
Action against removed personal administrator.

When letters testamentary or letters of administration are revoked, no action by or against the removed personal representative shall abate. The newly appointed personal representative may be made a party plaintiff or defendant in place of the removed personal representative.

The revocation of letters of administration shall not abate any action pending for or against the personal representative, but the newly appointed personal representative shall be made a party in proper cases as in the death of a party.

History.

Code 1981, §

53-7-14

, enacted by Ga. L. 1996, p. 504, § 10.

Cross references.

Substitution of parties by reason of death, §

9-11-25

.

53-7-15.
Applicability of provisions relating to sureties on guardians’
or conservators’ bonds.

The provisions of law governing the situation in which the surety on a guardian’s or conservator’s bond dies, becomes insolvent, removes beyond the limits of this state, from other cause becomes insufficient, or desires to be relieved as surety shall be applicable to sureties on personal representatives’ bonds.

History.

Code 1981, §

53-7-15

, enacted by Ga. L. 1996, p. 504, § 10; Ga. L. 2020, p. 377, § 1-42/HB 865.

The 2020 amendment,

effective January 1, 2021, inserted “or conservator’s” in this Code section.

53-7-16.
Joint and several liability of personal representative and sureties.

The personal representative and sureties shall be held and deemed joint and several obligors and may be subjected jointly and severally to liability in the same action. When a personal representative removes beyond the limits of this state, dies and leaves an unrepresented estate, or is in such a position that an attachment may be issued as against a debtor, any party in interest or any person having demands against that personal representative in the personal representative’s representative capacity may institute an action against the sureties or any one or more of them upon the bond of the personal representative in the first instance, without first obtaining a judgment against the personal representative in that person’s representative capacity. No prior judgment establishing the liability of the personal representative or a devastavit by the personal representative shall be necessary before an action is brought against the sureties on the bond.

History.

Code 1981, §

53-7-16

, enacted by Ga. L. 1996, p. 504, § 10.

53-7-17.
Liability on common bond of two or more personal representatives.

If two or more personal representatives unite in a common bond, all the sureties shall be bound for the acts of each personal representative and the personal representatives themselves shall be mutual sureties for each other’s conduct.

History.

Code 1981, §

53-7-17

, enacted by Ga. L. 1996, p. 504, § 10.

53-7-18.
Liability of sureties on bond of removed personal representative.

In all cases of removal of a personal representative for any cause, the sureties on that personal representative’s bond shall be liable for the personal representative’s acts in connection with the estate up to the time of settlement with another personal representative or the distributees of the estate.

History.

Code 1981, §

53-7-18

, enacted by Ga. L. 1996, p. 504, § 10.

53-7-19.
Action on bond for failure to settle and account with heir or beneficiary.

When any personal representative fails to settle and account with any heir or beneficiary of the estate, the heir or beneficiary may bring an action on the bond of the personal representative in the first instance and may recover judgment against the principal and the principal’s sureties without first bringing an action against the personal representative in that person’s representative capacity.

History.

Code 1981, §

53-7-19

, enacted by Ga. L. 1996, p. 504, § 10.

53-7-20.
Action on bond upon liability of decedent and return of execution marked nulla bona.

Upon the rendition of a judgment against a personal representative upon any liability of the decedent and a return of writ of execution marked nulla bona, the plaintiff may at once bring an action on the bond of the personal representative and may recover judgment against the principal and the sureties in the same action. If the principal has removed beyond the limits of this state or has died and has no legal representative, the plaintiff may bring an action against the sureties on the bond alone, without joining the principal.

History.

Code 1981, §

53-7-20

, enacted by Ga. L. 1996, p. 504, § 10.

53-7-21.
Against what property judgment levied.

In an action against a personal representative in that person’s representative capacity, the judgment shall generally be de bonis testatoris. However, when the personal representative unsuccessfully makes any of the defenses described in Code Section 53-7-10 or a release, the judgment shall be that the plaintiff recover both the debt and costs, to be first levied on the property of the decedent, if found, and if such property is not found, then to be levied on the property of the defendant personal representative.

History.

Code 1981, §

53-7-21

, enacted by Ga. L. 1996, p. 504, § 10.

53-7-22.
Levy upon property; entering of judgment and issuance of execution.

When a judgment has been obtained against the principal and surety or sureties on the bond of a personal representative, guardian, or other fiduciary, a levy may be made upon any property of any defendant in fi. fa.

The probate court shall be authorized to enter a judgment and to issue a writ of execution against the principal and surety or sureties on the bond of a personal representative, guardian, or other fiduciary and shall be further authorized to grant judgment and execution in favor of the surety or sureties against the principal upon payment of the judgment by the surety or sureties.

History.

Code 1981, §

53-7-22

, enacted by Ga. L. 1996, p. 504, § 10.

53-7-23.
Property upon which execution levied.

In all cases of judgments recovered against a personal representative and the sureties of a personal representative, the execution shall first be levied on the property of the sureties, and no levy shall be made on the property of the principal until there is a return of nulla bona as to the sureties.

History.

Code 1981, §

53-7-23

, enacted by Ga. L. 1996, p. 504, § 10.